Michigan, session 2025-2026, HB6312.
people of the state of michigan enact: Sec. 32f. (1) Notwithstanding any other provision of this act, the unemployment insurance agency shall retain a digital image of a claimant's original application and any certification issued to the claimant for not less than 7 years from when the unemployment insurance agency receives the original application or certification. The digital image must include a time stamp that indicates when the unemployment insurance agency received the document. (2) The unemployment insurance agency shall make the digital image of a claimant's document that is retained under this section available to the claimant, the claimant's authorized representative, the auditor general, or a member of the legislature for any of the following purposes: (a) An administrative or appeals hearing related to the claimant's claim. (b) An audit. (c) A legislative oversight hearing. (3) All digital images retained under this section must be stored securely in compliance with the data security policies and standards established by the department of technology, management, and budget under section 124 of the management and budget act, 1984 PA 431, MCL 18.1124, including access restrictions to authorized users and encryption. (4) The unemployment insurance agency shall conduct an annual audit of the digital image retention system and submit the results to the senate majority leader and the speaker of the house. (5) If the unemployment insurance agency fails to comply with this section, the unemployment insurance agency is subject to a civil fine of $5,000.00 per month until it complies with this section. A fine collected under this subsection must be deposited into the general fund.